Hawaii statutes.
[§412:2-606.5] Financial institution name
fraud. (a) No person shall use the name or trademark of a financial
institution, as defined in section 412:1-109, or its affiliates or subsidiaries
when marketing or soliciting existing or prospective customers if the marketing
materials are used without the written consent of the financial institution and
in a manner that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the material or
solicitation originated from, was endorsed by, is related to, or is the responsibility
of the financial institution or its affiliates or subsidiaries.

(b) The commissioner may impose a civil
penalty of up to $10,000 for each violation of this section. [L 2008, c 51, §2]

Revision Note

Enacted as an addition to article 1 of chapter 412, this
section was redesignated to this article pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next